Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB361.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Public Employer Disclosure Act.Section 2. Scope of act.This act relates to the duties of public employers relating to public employee information.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Employee organization." An organization or an agency or employee representation committee or plan in which membership is limited to public employees and which exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with public employers concerning 123456789101112131415161718 grievances, public employee-public employer disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment or conditions of work. The term does not include an organization which practices discrimination in membership because of race, color, creed, national origin or political affiliation."Public employee." An individual employed by a public employer. The term does not include elected officials, appointees of the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate as required by law, management level employees, confidential employees, clergymen or other persons in a religious profession, employees or personnel at church offices or facilities when utilized primarily for religious purposes."Public employer." The Commonwealth, its political subdivisions, including school districts and any officer, board, commission, agency, authority or other instrumentality thereof, a nonprofit organization or institution and any charitable, religious, scientific, literary, recreational, health, educational or welfare institution receiving grants or appropriations from the Federal, State or local government. The term does not include employers covered or presently subject to coverage under the act of June 1, 1937 (P.L.1168, No.294), known as the Pennsylvania Labor Relations Act."Representative." An individual who is authorized to act on behalf of an employee organization for public employees.Section 4. Duties of public employer.(a) Information.--A public employer shall provide to a representative, if the public employer has the information in the public employer's records, the following information for each public employee:(1) The public employee's name and date of hire.20250SB0361PN0307 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The public employee's contact information, including cell phone number, home telephone number, work telephone number, work email address and personal email address.(3) The public employee's job title, salary or rate of pay, work site location or duty station.(b) Transmittal of information.--(1) Subject to paragraph (2), a public employer shall provide the information required under subsection (a), in an easily searchable electronic format, to the representative. The information shall be transmitted as follows:(i) For a newly hired public employee in a bargaining unit, no later than 21 business days after the date of hire.(ii) For all public employees in a bargaining unit, no less than once every 120 days.(2) If there is a State-level representative for the employee organization for a bargaining unit, the public employer may elect to provide the information only to the State-level representative.(c) Meeting space.--Upon request, the public employer shall make space and time available for an employee organization to meet with public employees on a quarterly basis each year. The employee organization shall request the space and time no less than 10 business days before a meeting. Within five business days of a request, the public employer shall notify public employees of the time and location of the meeting.Section 5. Use of information.An employee organization may only use the information provided under section 4 for representation purposes. The employee organization may not sell or provide access to the 20250SB0361PN0307 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information provided under section 4 for any purpose other than as permitted under this act unless otherwise authorized under a collective bargaining agreement entered into between a public employer and a representative of the public employees under the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the Public Employe Relations Act.Section 6. Failure to comply.If a public employer fails to comply with the provisions of this act, the employee organization may bring an action in a court of appropriate jurisdiction to compel compliance. The court may order the public employer to pay costs and reasonable attorney fees incurred by the employee organization for bringing the action.Section 7. Collective bargaining agreement.Nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit a collective bargaining agreement from requiring more frequent transmittal of public employee information than required under section 4(b).Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250SB0361PN0307 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920